it: Accessori di montaggio inclusi: Clip per bocchetta dell’aria; Supporto per lettore CD; Dock/base di ricarica; Supporto per portabicchieri; Supporto adesivo per cruscotto; Supporto magnetico; Nessuno incluso; Supporto a ventosa; Clip per aletta parasole; Supporto per parabrezza; Altro
pl: Dołączone akcesoria montażowe: Uchwyt do kratki nawiewu; Uchwyt do szczeliny CD; Stacja dokująca/podstawka ładująca; Uchwyt na kubek; Uchwyt na deskę rozdzielczą na klej; Uchwyt magnetyczny; Brak w zestawie; Uchwyt na przyssawkę; Klips na osłonę przeciwsłoneczną; Uchwyt na szybę przednią; Inne
zh-CN: 包含的安装配件: 出风口夹; CD 槽支架; 充电底座/托架; 杯架支架; 仪表盘粘性支架; 磁性支架; 未包含; 吸盘支架; 遮阳板夹; 挡风玻璃支架; 其他
pt-BR: Acessórios de montagem incluídos: Clipe para saída de ar; Suporte para slot de CD; Base de carregamento; Suporte para porta-copos; Suporte adesivo para painel; Suporte magnético; Nenhum incluído; Suporte com ventosa; Clipe para quebra-sol; Suporte para para-brisa; Outros
sv: Inkluderade monteringstillbehör: Klämma för fläktgaller; Fäste för cd-läsare; Laddningsdocka/hållare; Fäste för mugghållare; Självhäftande fäste för instrumentpanel; Magnetfäste; Inga ingår; Sugkoppsfäste; Solskyddsklämma; Vindrutefäste; Övrigt
pt-PT: Acessórios de montagem incluídos: Mola para grelha de ventilação; Suporte para ranhura de CD; Base de carregamento/suporte; Suporte para porta-copos; Suporte adesivo para tabliê; Suporte magnético; Nenhum incluído; Suporte de ventosa; Mola para pala de sol; Suporte para para-brisas; Outro
nb: Inkludert monteringstilbehør: Klips til lufteventil; Feste for CD-spiller; Ladedokk/holder; Koppholderfeste; Selvklebende dashbordfeste; Magnetisk feste; Ingen inkludert; Sugekoppfeste; Solskjermklips; Frontrutefeste; Annet
es: Accesorios de montaje incluidos: Clip para rejilla de ventilación; Soporte para ranura de CD; Base/estación de carga; Soporte para portavasos; Soporte adhesivo para panel de control; Soporte magnético; Ninguno incluido; Soporte de ventosa; Clip para visera; Soporte para parabrisas; Otro
cs: Dodávané montážní příslušenství: Klip do mřížky ventilace; Držák do CD mechaniky; Nabíjecí stanice/kolébka; Držák do držáku na nápoje; Nalepovací držák na palubní desku; Magnetický držák; Žádné v balení; Držák s přísavkou; Klip na sluneční clonu; Držák na čelní sklo; Jiné
th: รวมอุปกรณ์สำหรับติดตั้งด้วย: คลิปติดช่องแอร์; ตัวยึดช่องใส่ CD; แท่นชาร์จ/แท่นวาง; ตัวยึดที่วางแก้ว; ตัวยึดติดกาวบนแดชบอร์ด; ตัวยึดแม่เหล็ก; ไม่มีให้; ตัวยึดจุกดูดสูญญากาศ; คลิปติดที่บังแดด; ตัวยึดกระจกหน้ารถ; อื่นๆ
tr: Dahil edilen montaj aksesuarları: Havalandırma klipsi; CD yuvası tutucusu; Şarj istasyonu/yuvası; Bardaklık tutucusu; Ön panel yapışkanlı tutucusu; Manyetik tutucu; Dahil değildir; Vantuzlu tutucu; Güneşlik klipsi; Ön cam tutucusu; Diğer
nl: Meegeleverde montageaccessoires: Ventilatieroosterclip; Cd-sleufhouder; Oplaadstation/houder; Bekerhouderbevestiging; Klevende dashboardhouder; Magnetische houder; Geen inbegrepen; Zuignaphouder; Zonneklepclip; Voorruithouder; Overige
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ τοποθέτησης: Κλιπ αεραγωγού; Βάση υποδοχής CD; Σταθμός/βάση φόρτισης; Βάση ποτηροθήκης; Αυτοκόλλητη βάση ταμπλό; Μαγνητική βάση; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται κανένα; Βάση με βεντούζα; Κλιπ σκιάστρου; Βάση παρμπρίζ; Άλλο
fr: Accessoires de montage inclus: Pince pour grille de ventilation; Support pour lecteur CD; Station/socle de recharge; Support pour porte-gobelet; Support adhésif pour tableau de bord; Support magnétique; Aucun support inclus; Support à ventouse; Pince pour pare-soleil; Support pour pare-brise; Autre
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za montažo: Sponka za prezračevalno režo; Nosilec za režo CD; Polnilna postaja/stojalo; Nosilec za držalo za kozarce; Lepilni nosilec za armaturno ploščo; Magnetni nosilec; Ni priloženo; Nosilec s priseskom; Sponka za senčnik; Nosilec za vetrobransko steklo; Drugo
fi: Mukana toimitetut kiinnitystarvikkeet: Ilmastointiritilän kiinnike; CD-aukon kiinnike; Lataustelakka; Mukitelinekiinnike; Kojelaudan tarrakiinnike; Magneettikiinnike; Ei sisälly; Imukuppikiinnike; Häikäisysuojan kiinnike; Tuulilasikiinnike; Muu
da: Medfølgende monteringsdele: Klemme til ventilationskanal; Montering i cd-sprække; Opladningsdock/holder; Montering i kopholder; Selvklæbende montering til instrumentbræt; Magnetisk montering; Ingen medfølger; Montering med sugekop; Klemme til solskærm; Montering på forrude; Andet
lt-LT: Įtraukti montavimo priedai: Ventiliacijos grotelių segtukas; CD lizdo laikiklis; Įkrovimo stotelė / laikiklis; Puodelių laikiklio tvirtinimas; Klijuojamas prietaisų skydelio laikiklis; Magnetinis laikiklis; Nėra; Laikiklis su siurbtuku; Skydelio segtukas; Priekinio stiklo laikiklis; Kita
hu: Mellékelt szerelési tartozékok: Szellőzőrácsra rögzíthető csipesz; CD-nyílásba rögzíthető tartó; Töltődokkoló/-állvány; Pohártartóba rögzíthető tartó; Műszerfalra ragasztható tartó; Mágneses tartó; Nincs mellékelve; Tapadókorongos tartó; Napellenzőre rögzíthető csipesz; Szélvédőre rögzíthető tartó; Egyéb
ja: 取り付け用アクセサリー付き: エアコン吹き出し口クリップ; CDスロットマウント; 充電ドック/クレードル; カップホルダーマウント; ダッシュボード粘着マウント; マグネットマウント; 付属品なし; 吸盤マウント; バイザークリップ; フロントガラスマウント; その他
en: Included mounting accessories: Air vent clip; CD-slot mount; Charging dock/cradle; Cup holder mount; Dashboard adhesive mount; Magnetic mount; None included; Suction cup mount; Visor clip; Windshield mount; Other
ru: Монтажные аксессуары в комплекте: Зажим на вентиляционную решетку; Крепление в слот CD; Зарядная док-станция/подставка; Крепление в подстаканник; Клейкое крепление на приборную панель; Магнитное крепление; Не входит в комплект; Крепление на присоске; Зажим на солнцезащитный козырек; Крепление на лобовое стекло; Другое
sk-SK: Dodávané montážne príslušenstvo: Spona do vetracej mriežky; Držiak do CD otvoru; Nabíjacia dokovacia stanica / kolíska; Držiak do držiaka na poháre; Lepiaci držiak na palubnú dosku; Magnetický držiak; Nie je súčasťou balenia; Držiak s prísavkou; Spona na tienidlo; Držiak na čelné sklo; Iné
bg-BG: Включени монтажни аксесоари: Щипка за въздуховод; Монтаж за CD слот; Докинг станция за зареждане; Монтаж за поставка за чаша; Залепваща стойка за табло; Магнитна стойка; Не са включени; Стойка с вендуза; Щипка за сенник; Стойка за предно стъкло; Други
hr-HR: Uključeni pribor za montažu: Kopča za ventilacijski otvor; Nosač za CD utor; Priključna stanica/stalak za punjenje; Nosač za držač čaša; Ljepljivi nosač za nadzornu ploču; Magnetski nosač; Nije uključeno; Nosač s priljepkom; Kopča za sjenilo; Nosač za vjetrobransko staklo; Ostalo
vi: Phụ kiện lắp đặt đi kèm: Kẹp cửa gió; Giá kẹp khe đĩa CD; Đế sạc; Giá kẹp khay để cốc; Đế dán bảng điều khiển xe; Giá kẹp nam châm; Không kèm theo; Giá kẹp hút chân không; Kẹp tấm che nắng; Giá kẹp kính chắn gió; Khác
de: Enthaltenes Montagezubehör: Lüftungsschlitz-Clip; CD-Schlitz-Halterung; Ladestation/-halterung; Getränkehalter-Halterung; Armaturenbrett-Klebepad; Magnethalterung; Keine enthalten; Saugnapfhalterung; Sonnenblenden-Clip; Windschutzscheibenhalterung; Sonstige
zh-TW: 隨附安裝配件: 冷氣孔夾; CD 槽底座; 充電座/托架; 杯架底座; 儀表板黏貼底座; 磁吸底座; 未隨附; 吸盤底座; 遮陽板夾; 擋風玻璃底座; 其他
ko: 장착 액세서리 포함: 송풍구 클립; CD 슬롯 마운트; 충전 도크/크래들; 컵홀더 마운트; 대시보드 접착식 마운트; 마그네틱 마운트; 미포함; 흡착컵 마운트; 바이저 클립; 윈드실드 마운트; 기타
ro-RO: Accesorii de montare incluse: Clemă pentru grila de ventilație; Suport pentru fanta CD; Stație de încărcare/suport; Montură pentru suportul de pahare; Suport adeziv pentru bord; Suport magnetic; Niciunul inclus; Suport cu ventuză; Clemă pentru parasolar; Suport pentru parbriz; Altele